Illinois, session 104th, HB1368.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 521B-45 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/21B-45)7    Sec. 21B-45. Professional Educator License renewal. 8    (a) Individuals holding a Professional Educator License 9are required to complete the licensure renewal requirements as 10specified in this Section, unless otherwise provided in this 11Code.12    Individuals holding a Professional Educator License shall 13meet the renewal requirements set forth in this Section, 14unless otherwise provided in this Code. If an individual holds 15a license endorsed in more than one area that has different 16renewal requirements, that individual shall follow the renewal 17requirements for the position for which he or she spends the 18majority of his or her time working.19    (b) All Professional Educator Licenses not renewed as 20provided in this Section shall lapse on September 1 of that 21year. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Section, if 22a license holder's electronic mail address is available, the 23State Board of Education shall send him or her notification   HB1368 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06225 LNS 16260 b1electronically that his or her license will lapse if not 2renewed, to be sent no more than 6 months prior to the license 3lapsing. Lapsed licenses may be immediately reinstated upon 4(i) payment to the State Board of Education by the applicant of 5a $50 penalty or (ii) the demonstration of proficiency by 6completing 9 semester hours of coursework from a regionally 7accredited institution of higher education in the content area 8that most aligns with one or more of the educator's 9endorsement areas. Any and all back fees, including without 10limitation registration fees owed from the time of expiration 11of the license until the date of reinstatement, shall be paid 12and kept in accordance with the provisions in Article 3 of this 13Code concerning an institute fund and the provisions in 14Article 21B of this Code concerning fees and requirements for 15registration. Licenses not registered in accordance with 16Section 21B-40 of this Code shall lapse after a period of 6 17months from the expiration of the last year of registration or 18on January 1 of the fiscal year following initial issuance of 19the license. An unregistered license is invalid after 20September 1 for employment and performance of services in an 21Illinois public or State-operated school or cooperative and in 22a charter school. Any license or endorsement may be 23voluntarily surrendered by the license holder. A voluntarily 24surrendered license shall be treated as a revoked license. An 25Educator License with Stipulations with only a 26paraprofessional endorsement does not lapse.   HB1368 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06225 LNS 16260 b1    (c) From July 1, 2013 through June 30, 2014, in order to 2satisfy the requirements for licensure renewal provided for in 3this Section, each professional educator licensee with an 4administrative endorsement who is working in a position 5requiring such endorsement shall complete one Illinois 6Administrators' Academy course, as described in Article 2 of 7this Code, per fiscal year.8    (c-5) All licenses issued by the State Board of Education 9under this Article that expire on June 30, 2020 and have not 10been renewed by the end of the 2020 renewal period shall be 11extended for one year and shall expire on June 30, 2021. 12    (d) Beginning July 1, 2014, in order to satisfy the 13requirements for licensure renewal provided for in this 14Section, each professional educator licensee may create a 15professional development plan each year. The plan shall 16address one or more of the endorsements that are required of 17his or her educator position if the licensee is employed and 18performing services in an Illinois public or State-operated 19school or cooperative. If the licensee is employed in a 20charter school, the plan shall address that endorsement or 21those endorsements most closely related to his or her educator 22position. Licensees employed and performing services in any 23other Illinois schools may participate in the renewal 24requirements by adhering to the same process.25    Except as otherwise provided in this Section, the 26licensee's professional development activities shall align   HB1368 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06225 LNS 16260 b1with one or more of the following criteria:2        (1) activities are of a type that engages participants 3    over a sustained period of time allowing for analysis, 4    discovery, and application as they relate to student 5    learning, social or emotional achievement, or well-being;6        (2) professional development aligns to the licensee's 7    performance;8        (3) outcomes for the activities must relate to student 9    growth or district improvement;10        (4) activities align to State-approved standards; and11        (5) higher education coursework.12    (e) For each renewal cycle, each professional educator 13licensee shall engage in professional development activities. 14Prior to renewal, the licensee shall enter electronically into 15the Educator Licensure Information System (ELIS) the name, 16date, and location of the activity, the number of professional 17development hours, and the provider's name. The following 18provisions shall apply concerning professional development 19activities:20        (1) Each licensee shall complete a total of 120 hours 21    of professional development per 5-year renewal cycle in 22    order to renew the license, except as otherwise provided 23    in this Section.24        (2) Beginning with his or her first full 5-year cycle, 25    any licensee with an administrative endorsement who is not 26    working in a position requiring such endorsement is not   HB1368 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 06225 LNS 16260 b1    required to complete Illinois Administrators' Academy 2    courses, as described in Article 2 of this Code. Such 3    licensees must complete one Illinois Administrators' 4    Academy course within one year after returning to a 5    position that requires the administrative endorsement. 6        (3) Any licensee with an administrative endorsement 7    who is working in a position requiring such endorsement or 8    an individual with a Teacher Leader endorsement serving in 9    an administrative capacity at least 50% of the day shall 10    complete one Illinois Administrators' Academy course, as 11    described in Article 2 of this Code, each fiscal year in 12    addition to 100 hours of professional development per 13    5-year renewal cycle in accordance with this Code. 14    However, for the 2021-2022 school year only, a licensee 15    under this paragraph (3) is not required to complete an 16    Illinois Administrators' Academy course.17        (4) Any licensee holding a current National Board for 18    Professional Teaching Standards (NBPTS) master teacher 19    designation shall complete a total of 60 hours of 20    professional development per 5-year renewal cycle in order 21    to renew the license.22        (5) Licensees working in a position that does not 23    require educator licensure or working in a position for 24    less than 50% for any particular year are considered to be 25    exempt and shall be required to pay only the registration 26    fee in order to renew and maintain the validity of the   HB1368 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 06225 LNS 16260 b1    license.2        (6) Licensees who are retired and qualify for benefits 3    from a State of Illinois retirement system shall be listed 4    as retired, and the license shall be maintained in retired 5    status. For any renewal cycle in which a licensee retires 6    during the renewal cycle, the licensee must complete 7    professional development activities on a prorated basis 8    depending on the number of years during the renewal cycle 9    the educator held an active license. If a licensee retires 10    during a renewal cycle, the license status must be updated 11    using ELIS indicating that the licensee wishes to maintain 12    the license in retired status and the licensee must show 13    proof of completion of professional development activities 14    on a prorated basis for all years of that renewal cycle for 15    which the license was active. An individual with a license 16    in retired status shall not be required to complete 17    professional development activities until returning to a 18    position that requires educator licensure. Upon returning 19    to work in a position that requires the Professional 20    Educator License, the license status shall immediately be 21    updated using ELIS and the licensee shall complete renewal 22    requirements for that year. A retired teacher, even if 23    returning to a position that requires educator licensure, 24    shall not be required to pay registration fees. A license 25    in retired status cannot lapse. Beginning on January 6, 26    2017 (the effective date of Public Act 99-920) through   HB1368 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 06225 LNS 16260 b1    December 31, 2017, any licensee who has retired and whose 2    license has lapsed for failure to renew as provided in 3    this Section may reinstate that license and maintain it in 4    retired status upon providing proof to the State Board of 5    Education using ELIS that the licensee is retired and is 6    not working in a position that requires a Professional 7    Educator License.8        (7) For any renewal cycle in which professional 9    development hours were required, but not fulfilled, the 10    licensee shall complete any missed hours to total the 11    minimum professional development hours required in this 12    Section prior to September 1 of that year. Professional 13    development hours used to fulfill the minimum required 14    hours for a renewal cycle may be used for only one renewal 15    cycle. For any fiscal year or renewal cycle in which an 16    Illinois Administrators' Academy course was required but 17    not completed, the licensee shall complete any missed 18    Illinois Administrators' Academy courses prior to 19    September 1 of that year. The licensee may complete all 20    deficient hours and Illinois Administrators' Academy 21    courses while continuing to work in a position that 22    requires that license until September 1 of that year.23        (8) Any licensee who has not fulfilled the 24    professional development renewal requirements set forth in 25    this Section at the end of any 5-year renewal cycle is 26    ineligible to register his or her license and may submit   HB1368 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 06225 LNS 16260 b1    an appeal to the State Superintendent of Education for 2    reinstatement of the license. 3        (9) If professional development opportunities were 4    unavailable to a licensee, proof that opportunities were 5    unavailable and request for an extension of time beyond 6    August 31 to complete the renewal requirements may be 7    submitted from April 1 through June 30 of that year to the 8    State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board. If an 9    extension is approved, the license shall remain valid 10    during the extension period. 11        (10) Individuals who hold exempt licenses prior to 12    December 27, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 13    98-610) shall commence the annual renewal process with the 14    first scheduled registration due after December 27, 2013 15    (the effective date of Public Act 98-610). 16        (11) Notwithstanding any other provision of this 17    subsection (e), if a licensee earns more than the required 18    number of professional development hours during a renewal 19    cycle, then the licensee may carry over any hours earned 20    from April 1 through June 30 of the last year of the 21    renewal cycle. Any hours carried over in this manner must 22    be applied to the next renewal cycle. Illinois 23    Administrators' Academy courses or hours earned in those 24    courses may not be carried over. 25    (e-5) The number of professional development hours 26required under subsection (e) is reduced by 20% for any   HB1368 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 06225 LNS 16260 b1renewal cycle that includes the 2021-2022 school year. 2    (f) At the time of renewal, each licensee shall respond to 3the required questions under penalty of perjury.4    (f-5) The State Board of Education shall conduct random 5audits of licensees to verify a licensee's fulfillment of the 6professional development hours required under this Section. 7Upon completion of a random audit, if it is determined by the 8State Board of Education that the licensee did not complete 9the required number of professional development hours or did 10not provide sufficient proof of completion, the licensee shall 11be notified that his or her license has lapsed. A license that 12has lapsed under this subsection may be reinstated as provided 13in subsection (b). 14    (g) The following entities shall be designated as approved 15to provide professional development activities for the renewal 16of Professional Educator Licenses:17        (1) The State Board of Education.18        (2) Regional offices of education and intermediate 19    service centers.20        (3) Illinois professional associations representing 21    the following groups that are approved by the State 22    Superintendent of Education:23            (A) school administrators;24            (B) principals;25            (C) school business officials;26            (D) teachers, including special education   HB1368 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 06225 LNS 16260 b1        teachers;2            (E) school boards;3            (F) school districts;4            (G) parents; and 5            (H) school service personnel. 6        (4) Regionally accredited institutions of higher 7    education that offer Illinois-approved educator 8    preparation programs and public community colleges subject 9    to the Public Community College Act.10        (5) Illinois public school districts, charter schools 11    authorized under Article 27A of this Code, and joint 12    educational programs authorized under Article 10 of this 13    Code for the purposes of providing career and technical 14    education or special education services.15        (6) A not-for-profit organization that, as of December 16    31, 2014 (the effective date of Public Act 98-1147), has 17    had or has a grant from or a contract with the State Board 18    of Education to provide professional development services 19    in the area of English Learning to Illinois school 20    districts, teachers, or administrators. 21        (7) State agencies, State boards, and State 22    commissions. 23        (8) Museums as defined in Section 10 of the Museum 24    Disposition of Property Act. 25    (h) Approved providers under subsection (g) of this 26Section shall make available professional development   HB1368 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 06225 LNS 16260 b1opportunities that satisfy at least one of the following: 2        (1) increase the knowledge and skills of school and 3    district leaders who guide continuous professional 4    development;5        (2) improve the learning of students;6        (3) organize adults into learning communities whose 7    goals are aligned with those of the school and district;8        (4) deepen educator's content knowledge;9        (5) provide educators with research-based 10    instructional strategies to assist students in meeting 11    rigorous academic standards;12        (6) prepare educators to appropriately use various 13    types of classroom assessments;14        (7) use learning strategies appropriate to the 15    intended goals;16        (8) provide educators with the knowledge and skills to 17    collaborate;18        (9) prepare educators to apply research to decision 19    making;20        (10) provide educators with training on inclusive 21    practices in the classroom that examines instructional and 22    behavioral strategies that improve academic and 23    social-emotional outcomes for all students, with or 24    without disabilities, in a general education setting; or25        (11) beginning on July 1, 2022, provide educators with 26    training on the physical and mental health needs of   HB1368 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 06225 LNS 16260 b1    students, student safety, educator ethics, professional 2    conduct, and other topics that address the well-being of 3    students and improve the academic and social-emotional 4    outcomes of students.5    (i) Approved providers under subsection (g) of this 6Section shall do the following:7        (1) align professional development activities to the 8    State-approved national standards for professional 9    learning;10        (2) meet the professional development criteria for 11    Illinois licensure renewal;12        (3) produce a rationale for the activity that explains 13    how it aligns to State standards and identify the 14    assessment for determining the expected impact on student 15    learning or school improvement;16        (4) maintain original documentation for completion of 17    activities;18        (5) provide license holders with evidence of 19    completion of activities;20        (6) request an Illinois Educator Identification Number 21    (IEIN) for each educator during each professional 22    development activity; and 23        (7) beginning on July 1, 2019, register annually with 24    the State Board of Education prior to offering any 25    professional development opportunities in the current 26    fiscal year; and .   HB1368 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 06225 LNS 16260 b1        (8) ensure that professional development activities 2    related to literacy instruction are aligned to 3    evidence-based strategies as defined in the comprehensive 4    literacy plan for the State developed by the State Board 5    of Education under Public Act 103-402. 6    (j) The State Board of Education shall conduct annual 7audits of a subset of approved providers, except for school 8districts, which shall be audited by regional offices of 9education and intermediate service centers. The State Board of 10Education shall ensure that each approved provider, except for 11a school district, is audited at least once every 5 years. The 12State Board of Education may conduct more frequent audits of 13providers if evidence suggests the requirements of this 14Section or administrative rules are not being met.15        (1) (Blank).16        (2) Approved providers shall comply with the 17    requirements in subsections (h) and (i) of this Section by 18    annually submitting data to the State Board of Education 19    demonstrating how the professional development activities 20    impacted one or more of the following:21            (A) educator and student growth in regards to 22        content knowledge or skills, or both;23            (B) educator and student social and emotional 24        growth; or25            (C) alignment to district or school improvement 26        plans.  HB1368 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 06225 LNS 16260 b1        (3) The State Superintendent of Education shall review 2    the data collected by the State Board of Education, 3    regional offices of education, and intermediate service 4    centers in audits conducted under this subsection (j) to 5    determine if the approved provider has met the criteria 6    and should continue to be an approved provider or if 7    further action should be taken as provided in rules.8    (k) Registration fees shall be paid for the next renewal 9cycle between April 1 and June 30 in the last year of each 105-year renewal cycle using ELIS. If all required professional 11development hours for the renewal cycle have been completed 12and entered by the licensee, the licensee shall pay the 13registration fees for the next cycle using a form of credit or 14debit card. 15    (l) Any professional educator licensee endorsed for school 16support personnel who is employed and performing services in 17Illinois public schools and who holds an active and current 18professional license issued by the Department of Financial and 19Professional Regulation or a national certification board, as 20approved by the State Board of Education, related to the 21endorsement areas on the Professional Educator License shall 22be deemed to have satisfied the continuing professional 23development requirements provided for in this Section. Such 24individuals shall be required to pay only registration fees to 25renew the Professional Educator License. An individual who 26does not hold a license issued by the Department of Financial   HB1368 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 06225 LNS 16260 b1and Professional Regulation shall complete professional 2development requirements for the renewal of a Professional 3Educator License provided for in this Section.4    (m) Appeals to the State Educator Preparation and 5Licensure Board must be made within 30 days after receipt of 6notice from the State Superintendent of Education that a 7license will not be renewed based upon failure to complete the 8requirements of this Section. A licensee may appeal that 9decision to the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board 10in a manner prescribed by rule.11        (1) Each appeal shall state the reasons why the State 12    Superintendent's decision should be reversed and shall be 13    sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the 14    State Board of Education.15        (2) The State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board 16    shall review each appeal regarding renewal of a license 17    within 90 days after receiving the appeal in order to 18    determine whether the licensee has met the requirements of 19    this Section. The State Educator Preparation and Licensure 20    Board may hold an appeal hearing or may make its 21    determination based upon the record of review, which shall 22    consist of the following:23            (A) the regional superintendent of education's 24        rationale for recommending nonrenewal of the license, 25        if applicable;26            (B) any evidence submitted to the State   HB1368 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 06225 LNS 16260 b1        Superintendent along with the individual's electronic 2        statement of assurance for renewal; and3            (C) the State Superintendent's rationale for 4        nonrenewal of the license.5        (3) The State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board 6    shall notify the licensee of its decision regarding 7    license renewal by certified mail, return receipt 8    requested, no later than 30 days after reaching a 9    decision. Upon receipt of notification of renewal, the 10    licensee, using ELIS, shall pay the applicable 11    registration fee for the next cycle using a form of credit 12    or debit card.13    (n) The State Board of Education may adopt rules as may be 14necessary to implement this Section.15(Source: P.A. 102-676, eff. 12-3-21; 102-710, eff. 4-27-22; 16102-730, eff. 5-6-22; 102-852, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 176-30-23; 103-780, eff. 8-2-24.) 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.